Alaska, session 34, HB307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 25.20 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 25.20.113. Compensatory visitation. (a) A court shall order 06 compensatory visitation between a child and a person if 07 (1) a court order exists that is specific as to when the custodian of the 08 child must permit the person to have visitation with the child; 09 (2) the visitation described in (1) of this subsection did not occur in 10 substantial conformance with the court order while the department was investigating 11 an allegation that the person subjected the child to a condition listed in AS 47.10.011; 12 (3) the department finds the allegation is unsubstantiated; and 13 (4) the child's custodian fails to establish other good cause for 14 deviating from the court's order. 01 (b) In ordering additional visitation under (a) of this section to compensate a 02 person for visitation that did not occur while the person was under investigation by the 03 department, the court shall 04 (1) ensure that the compensatory visitation is of the same type and 05 duration as the visitation specified in the original order that did not occur; 06 (2) ensure that the compensatory visitation occurs within two years 07 after the date the court enters the order; and 08 (3) impose reasonable conditions necessary to protect the best interests 09 of the child. 10 (c) In this section, "department" means the Department of Family and 11 Community Services. 12 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 13 read: 14 APPLICABILITY. AS 25.20.113, enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to court- 15 ordered visitation between a person and a child that was denied on or after the effective date 16 of this Act while the department investigated an allegation that the person subjected the child 17 to a condition listed in AS 47.10.011. 18 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.